Hawaii statutes.
§263-3 Ownership of space. The
ownership of the space above the lands and waters of the State is declared to
be vested in the several owners of the surface beneath, subject to the right of
flight described in section 263-4. [L 1923, c 109, §3; RL 1925, §3893; RL 1935,
§6977; RL 1945, §4923; RL 1955, §16-3; HRS §263-3]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next